Hawaii statutes.
§560:7-206 Trust proceedings; initiation by
notice; necessary parties. Proceedings under section 560:7-201 are
initiated by filing a petition in the court and giving notice pursuant to
section 560:1-401 to interested persons. The court may order notification of
additional persons. A decree is valid as to all who are given notice of the
proceeding though fewer than all interested persons are notified. [L 1976, c
200, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Trust proceedings, see HPR rule 126.

Case Notes

Term "decree" includes the term "order";
section not mutually exclusive with §560:1-403; applicable to §560:1-106. 7 H.
App. 640, 791 P.2d 398.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next